Illinois, session 104th, HB539.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Private Activity Bond Allocation 5Act is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 345/1)  (from Ch. 17, par. 6851)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act shall be known and and may be 8cited as the "Illinois Private Activity Bond Allocation Act".9(Source: P.A. 84-952.)